client/modules/cm-espells/vendor/de.aff
flag *p:
   A    > -A,EN
   AAL    > -AAL,ÄLE
   AAL    > -AAL,ÄLEN
   AAL    > -AAL,äLE
   AAL    > -AAL,äLEN
   AB    > -AB,äBE
   AB    > -AB,äBEN
   ABEN    > -ABEN,äBEN
   ABEL    > -ABEL,äBEL
   ABEL    > -ABEL,äBELN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHE
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHEN
   ACHT    > -ACHT,äCHTE
   ACHT    > -ACHT,äCHTEN
   ACHS    > -ACHS,äCHSE
   ACHS    > -ACHS,äCHSEN
   ACK    > -ACK,äCKE
   ACK    > -ACK,äCKEN
   ADT    > -ADT,äDTE
   ADT    > -ADT,äDTEN
   ADE    > -ADE,äDE
   ADE    > -ADE,äDEN
   ADEN    > -ADEN,äDEN
   AFEL    > -AFEL,äFEL
   AFEL    > -AFEL,äFELN
   AGEL    > -AGEL,äGEL
   AGEL    > -AGEL,äGELN
   AGEN    > -AGEN,äGEN
   AFEN    > -AFEN,äFEN
   AFT    > -AFT,äFTE
   AFT    > -AFT,äFTEN
   AG    > -AG,äGE
   AG    > -AG,äGEN
   AGEN    > -AGEN,äGEN
   AHL    > -AHL,äHLE
   AHL    > -AHL,äHLEN
   AHN    > -AHN,äHNE
   AHN    > -AHN,äHNEN
   AHT    > -AHT,äHTE
   AHT    > -AHT,äHTEN
   AL    > -AL,äLE
   AL    > -AL,äLEN
   ALER    > -ALER,äLER
   ALER    > -ALER,äLERN
   ALG    > -ALG,äLGE
   ALG    > -ALG,äLGEN
   ALL    > -ALL,äLLE
   ALL    > -ALL,äLLEN
   ALS    > -ALS,äLSE
   ALS    > -ALS,äLSEN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTE
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTEN
   AMM    > -AMM,äMME
   AMM    > -AMM,äMMEN
   AMMER    > -AMMER,äMMER
   AMMER    > -AMMER,äMMERN
   AMS    > -AMS,äMSE
   AMS    > -AMS,äMSEN
   AMPF    > -AMPF,äMPFE
   AMPF    > -AMPF,äMPFEN
   AN    > -AN,äNE
   AN    > -AN,äNEN
   ANAL    > -ANAL,ANäLE
   ANAL    > -ANAL,ANäLEN
   AND    > -AND,äNDE
   AND    > -AND,äNDEN
   ANDEL    > -ANDEL,äNDEL
   ANDEL    > -ANDEL,äNDELN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGE
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGEN
   ANGEL    > -ANGEL,äNGEL
   ANGEL    > -ANGEL,äNGELN
   ANGEL    > -ANGEL,ÄNGEL
   ANGEL    > -ANGEL,ÄNGELN
   ANGST    > -ANGST,ÄNGSTE
   ANGST    > -ANGST,ÄNGSTEN
   ANGST    > -ANGST,äNGSTE
   ANGST    > -ANGST,äNGSTEN
   ANFT    > -ANFT,äNFTE
   ANFT    > -ANFT,äNFTEN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKE
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKEN
   ANKER    > -ANKER,äNKER
   ANKER    > -ANKER,äNKERN
   ANS    > -ANS,äNSE
   ANS    > -ANS,äNSEN
   ANST    > -ANST,äNSTE
   ANST    > -ANST,äNSTEN
   ANTEL    > -ANTEL,äNTEL
   ANTEL    > -ANTEL,äNTELN
   ANZ    > -ANZ,äNZE
   ANZ    > -ANZ,äNZEN
   APF    > -APF,äPFE
   APF    > -APF,äPFEN
   APFEN    > -APFEN,äPFEN
   APS    > -APS,äPSE
   APS    > -APS,äPSEN
   APST    > -APST,äPSTE
   APST    > -APST,äPSTEN
   APFE    > -APFE,äPFE
   APFE    > -APFE,äPFEN
   APFEL    > -APFEL,äPFEL
   APFEL    > -APFEL,äPFELN
   APFEL    > -APFEL,ÄPFEL
   APFEL    > -APFEL,ÄPFELN
   AR    > -AR,äRE
   AR    > -AR,äREN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGE
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGEN
   ARG    > -ARG,ÄRGE
   ARG    > -ARG,ÄRGEN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKE
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKEN
   ARKT    > -ARKT,äRKTE
   ARKT    > -ARKT,äRKTEN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRME
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMEN
   ARM    > -ARM,ÄRME
   ARM    > -ARM,ÄRMEN
   ART    > -ART,äRTE
   ART    > -ART,äRTEN
   ARTEN    > -ARTEN,äRTEN
   ASSER    > -ASSER,äSSER
   ASSER    > -ASSER,äSSERN
   AST    > -AST,äSTE
   AST    > -AST,äSTEN
   AST    > -AST,ÄSTE
   AST    > -AST,ÄSTEN
   ASTEN    > -ASTEN,äSTEN
   ARSCH    > -ARSCH,äRSCHE
   ARSCH    > -ARSCH,äRSCHEN
   ARSCH    > -ARSCH,ÄRSCHE
   ARSCH    > -ARSCH,ÄRSCHEN
   ARZT    > -ARZT,äRZTE
   ARZT    > -ARZT,äRZTEN
   ARZT    > -ARZT,ÄRZTE
   ARZT    > -ARZT,ÄRZTEN
   AS    > -AS,äSE
   AS    > -AS,äSEN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSE
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSEN
   Aß    > -Aß,ASSES
   Aß    > -Aß,äßE
   Aß    > -Aß,äßEN
   ASTEN    > -ASTEN,äSTEN
   AT    > -AT,äTE
   AT    > -AT,äTEN
   ATER    > -ATER,äTER
   ATER    > -ATER,äTERN
   ATT    > -ATT,äTTE
   ATT    > -ATT,äTTEN
   ATTEL    > -ATTEL,äTTEL
   ATTEL    > -ATTEL,äTTELN
   ATZ    > -ATZ,äTZE
   ATZ    > -ATZ,äTZEN
   AU    > -AU,äUE
   AU    > -AU,äUEN
   AUCH    > -AUCH,äUCHE
   AUCH    > -AUCH,äUCHEN
   AUF    > -AUF,äUFE
   AUF    > -AUF,äUFEN
   AUFE    > -AUFE,äUFE
   AUFE    > -AUFE,äUFEN
   AUL    > -AUL,äULE
   AUL    > -AUL,äULEN
   AUM    > -AUM,äUME
   AUM    > -AUM,äUMEN
   AUN    > -AUN,äUNE
   AUN    > -AUN,äUNEN
   AUS    > -AUS,äUSE
   AUS    > -AUS,äUSEN
   AUS    > -AUS,äUSE
   AUS    > -AUS,äUSEN
   AUSS    > -AUSS,äUSSE
   AUSS    > -AUSS,äUSSEN
   AUSCH    > -AUSCH,äUSCHE
   AUSCH    > -AUSCH,äUSCHEN
   AUST    > -AUST,äUSTE
   AUST    > -AUST,äUSTEN
   AUT    > -AUT,äUTE
   AUT    > -AUT,äUTEN
   AXT    > -AXT,äXTE
   AXT    > -AXT,äXTEN
   AXT    > -AXT,ÄXTE
   AXT    > -AXT,ÄXTEN
   ENS    > -ENS,ENTIA
   ENS    > -ENS,ENZIEN
   Eß    > -Eß,ESSES
   IS    > -IS,EN
   IRMA    > -IRMA,IRMEN
   IUM    > -IUM,IEN
   IUM    > -IUM,IEN
   O    > -O,EN
   OCH    > -OCH,öCHE
   OCH    > -OCH,öCHEN
   OCHTER    > -OCHTER,öCHTER
   OCHTER    > -OCHTER,öCHTERN
   OCK    > -OCK,öCKE
   OCK    > -OCK,öCKEN
   OF    > -OF,öFE
   OF    > -OF,öFEN
   OG    > -OG,öGE
   OG    > -OG,öGEN
   OGT    > -OGT,öGTE
   OGT    > -OGT,öGTEN
   OGEL    > -OGEL,öGEL
   OGEL    > -OGEL,öGELN
   ODEN    > -ODEN,öDEN
   OFEN    > -OFEN,öFEN
   OGEN    > -OGEN,öGEN
   OH    > -OH,öHE
   OH    > -OH,öHEN
   OHN    > -OHN,öHNE
   OHN    > -OHN,öHNEN
   OHR    > -OHR,öHRE
   OHR    > -OHR,öHREN
   OLF    > -OLF,öLFE
   OLF    > -OLF,öLFEN
   OLL    > -OLL,öLLE
   OLL    > -OLL,öLLEN
   OM    > -OM,öME
   OM    > -OM,öMEN
   ON    > -ON,öNE
   ON    > -ON,öNEN
   OOG    > -OOG,öGE
   OOG    > -OOG,öGEN
   OPF    > -OPF,öPFE
   OPF    > -OPF,öPFEN
   OPS    > -OPS,öPSE
   OPS    > -OPS,öPSEN
   OR    > -OR,öRE
   OR    > -OR,öREN
   ORB    > -ORB,öRBE
   ORB    > -ORB,öRBEN
   ORCH    > -ORCH,öRCHE
   ORCH    > -ORCH,öRCHEN
   ORUS    > -ORUS,öRE
   ORUS    > -ORUS,öREN
   OSCH    > -OSCH,öSCHE
   OSCH    > -OSCH,öSCHEN
   OSTER    > -OSTER,öSTER
   OSTER    > -OSTER,öSTERN
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSE
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSEN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSE
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSEN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößE
   Oß    > -Oß,ößEN
   OT    > -OT,öTE
   OT    > -OT,öTEN
   OTZ    > -OTZ,öTZE
   OTZ    > -OTZ,öTZEN
   UB    > -UB,üBE
   UB    > -UB,üBEN
   UCH    > -UCH,üCHE
   UCH    > -UCH,üCHEN
   UCHS    > -UCHS,üCHSE
   UCHS    > -UCHS,üCHSEN
   UCHT    > -UCHT,üCHTE
   UCHT    > -UCHT,üCHTEN
   UCK    > -UCK,üCKE
   UCK    > -UCK,üCKEN
   UDER    > -UDER,üDER
   UDER    > -UDER,üDERN
   UFT    > -UFT,üFTE
   UFT    > -UFT,üFTEN
   UG    > -UG,üGE
   UG    > -UG,üGEN
   UH    > -UH,üHE
   UH    > -UH,üHEN
   UHL    > -UHL,üHLE
   UHL    > -UHL,üHLEN
   ULST    > -ULST,üLSTE
   ULST    > -ULST,üLSTEN
   UMPF    > -UMPF,üMPFE
   UMPF    > -UMPF,üMPFEN
   UND    > -UND,üNDE
   UND    > -UND,üNDEN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGE
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGEN
   UNFT    > -UNFT,üNFTE
   UNFT    > -UNFT,üNFTEN
   UNK    > -UNK,üNKE
   UNK    > -UNK,üNKEN
   UNKT    > -UNKT,üNKTE
   UNKT    > -UNKT,üNKTEN
   UNST    > -UNST,üNSTE
   UNST    > -UNST,üNSTEN
   UNSCH    > -UNSCH,üNSCHE
   UNSCH    > -UNSCH,üNSCHEN
   UPF    > -UPF,üPFE
   UPF    > -UPF,üPFEN
   UPS    > -UPS,üPSE
   UPS    > -UPS,üPSEN
   UR    > -UR,üRE
   UR    > -UR,üREN
   URF    > -URF,üRFE
   URF    > -URF,üRFEN
   URM    > -URM,üRME
   URM    > -URM,üRMEN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZE
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZEN
   URSCHT    > -URSCHT,üRSCHTE
   URSCHT    > -URSCHT,üRSCHTEN
   URST    > -URST,üRSTE
   URST    > -URST,üRSTEN
   UT    > -UT,üTE
   UT    > -UT,üTEN
   USCH    > -USCH,üSCHE
   USCH    > -USCH,üSCHEN
   USS    > -USS,üSSE
   USS    > -USS,üSSEN
   UST    > -UST,üSTE
   UST    > -UST,üSTEN
   Uß    > -Uß,üßE
   Uß    > -Uß,üßEN
   Uß    > -Uß,üSSE
   Uß    > -Uß,üSSEN
   UTTER    > -UTTER,üTTER
   UTTER    > -UTTER,üTTERN

flag *q:
   SS    > -SS,SSE
   SS    > -SS,SSES
   SS    > -SS,SSEN
   ß    > -ß,SSE
   ß    > -ß,SSES
   ß    > -ß,SSEN


flag *r:
   AU    > -AU,AUTEN
   ON    > -ON,EN
   OS    > -OS,EN
   UM    > -UM,EN
   US    > -US,EN

flag *s:
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHER
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERN
   ACK    > -ACK,äCKER
   ACK    > -ACK,äCKERN
   AD    > -AD,äDER
   AD    > -AD,äDERN
   AL    > -AL,äLER
   AL    > -AL,äLERN
   ALB    > -ALB,äLBER
   ALB    > -ALB,äLBERN
   ALD    > -ALD,äLDER
   ALD    > -ALD,äLDERN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTER
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERN
   AMM    > -AMM,äMMER
   AMM    > -AMM,äMMERN
   AMS    > -AMS,äMSER
   AMS    > -AMS,äMSERN
   AMT    > -AMT,äMTER
   AMT    > -AMT,äMTERN
   AND    > -AND,äNDER
   AND    > -AND,äNDERN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKER
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERN
   ANN    > -ANN,äNNER
   ANN    > -ANN,äNNERN
   AS    > -AS,äSER
   AS    > -AS,äSERN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSER
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSER
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERN
   ATT    > -ATT,äTTER
   ATT    > -ATT,äTTERN
   AUCH    > -AUCH,äUCHER
   AUCH    > -AUCH,äUCHERN
   AUL    > -AUL,äULER
   AUL    > -AUL,äULERN
   AUPT    > -AUPT,äUPTER
   AUPT    > -AUPT,äUPTERN
   AUS    > -AUS,äUSER
   AUS    > -AUS,äUSERN
   AUT    > -AUT,äUTER
   AUT    > -AUT,äUTERN
   IEH    > -IEH,IECHER
   OCH    > -OCH,öCHER
   OCH    > -OCH,öCHERN
   OLK    > -OLK,öLKER
   OLK    > -OLK,öLKERN
   OLZ    > -OLZ,öLZER
   OLZ    > -OLZ,öLZERN
   ORF    > -ORF,öRFER
   ORF    > -ORF,öRFERN
   ORN    > -ORN,öRNER
   ORN    > -ORN,öRNERN
   ORT    > -ORT,öRTER
   ORT    > -ORT,öRTERN
   OTT    > -OTT,öTTER
   OTT    > -OTT,öTTERN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSES
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSER
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERN
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSES
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSER
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSERN
   OTT    > -OTT,öTTER
   OTT    > -OTT,öTTERN
   UCH    > -UCH,üCHER
   UCH    > -UCH,üCHERN
   UHN    > -UHN,üHNER
   UHN    > -UHN,üHNERN
   UM    > -UM,üMER
   UM    > -UM,üMERN
   URM    > -URM,üRMER
   URM    > -URM,üRMERN
   UT    > -UT,üTER
   UT    > -UT,üTERN

flag *t:
   E    > NS

flag *u:
   UM    > -UM,A
   US    > -US,I
   ON    > -ON,A
   O    > -O,EN
   E    > -E,I
   A    > -A,E

flag *v:
   US    > -US,IER
   IS    > -IS,EN
   AS    > -AS,EN
   OS    > -OS,EN
   NS    > -S,ZIEN
   NS    > -S,TEN
   NS    > -S,TIA
   IV    > A
   ON    > -ON,EN
   STA    > -STA,STEN

flag *w:
   Y    > -Y,IES
   Y    > -Y,YS
   IS    > -IS,IDEN
   IX    > -IX,IZES
   IX    > -IX,ICES
   EX    > -EX,IZES
   EX    > -EX,ICES
   O    > -O,I
   S    > -S,ZIEN
   ENS    > -S,TIA
   [BLPRZGS]    > IEN
   E    > -E,IEN
   E    > -E,IA
   EN    > -EN,INA
   MAN    > -MAN,MEN
   MAN    > -MAN,MEN

PFX G N 1
PFX G   0     ge           .
PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un           .
PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0     ver        . 
 
SFX A Y 46
SFX A   0       r          e
SFX A   0       n          e
SFX A   0       m          e
SFX A   0       s          e
SFX A   0       e          [^elr]
SFX A   0       er         [^elr]
SFX A   0       en         [^elr]
SFX A   0       em         [^elr]
SFX A   0       es         [^elr]
SFX A   0       e          [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       er         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       en         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       em         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       es         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       e          [^u]er
SFX A   0       er         [^u]er
SFX A   0       en         [^u]er
SFX A   0       em         [^u]er
SFX A   0       es         [^u]er
SFX A   er      re         uer
SFX A   er      rer        uer
SFX A   er      ren        uer
SFX A   er      rem        uer
SFX A   er      res        uer
SFX A   0       e          [eil]el
SFX A   0       er         [eil]el
SFX A   0       en         [eil]el
SFX A   0       em         [eil]el
SFX A   0       es         [eil]el
SFX A   el      le         [^eil]el
SFX A   el      ler        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      len        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      lem        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      les        [^eil]el
SFX A   lig     elig       [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     elige      [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eliger     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eligen     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eligem     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eliges     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   erig    rig        [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rige       [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    riger      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rigen      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rigem      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    riges      [^hi]erig
